Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 3 Criminal Offenses

47-3-1.
Possession of unsealed or incorrect weights or measures — Removal of notice forbidding use.

No person engaged in the trade of buying and selling shall have or permit to be kept at his or her place of business or upon any cart, wagon, or other vehicle used by him or her in carrying on his or her business, any weight, measures, or balance, of whatever description, which is not at the time duly sealed in accordance with chapters 1 and 2 of this title, or which, having been sealed, is no longer correct. If the weights, measures, or balances can be readily adjusted by such means as the sealer has at hand, the sealer may adjust and seal them; but if they cannot be readily adjusted, the sealer shall either seize the weights, measures, and balances forthwith and destroy them, or shall affix to them a notice forbidding their use until the sealer is satisfied that they have been so adjusted to conform to the standards; and whoever removes the notice without the consent of the officer affixing the notice, shall for each offense be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), one-half (1/2) to the town or city and one-half (1/2) to the use of the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

47-3-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 345, § 1.

47-3-2.
Use of unsealed weights or measures — Alteration — Refusal to allow examination — Adjustable face.

Every person engaged in the trade of buying and selling, or of selling, or as a public weigher, who shall use or permit to be used for him or her, or have in his or her possession at his or her place of business, or upon any cart, wagon, or other vehicle which is used by him or her in carrying on his or her business, or upon his or her person while engaged in his or her business, any weight, measure, balance, or scale of whatever description, unless the weight, measure, balance, or scale shall have been duly sealed in conformity with the provisions of chapters 1 and 2 of this title, and every person who alters any weight, measure, balance, or scale after it has been duly sealed, so that it does not conform to the United States standard, or has in his or her possession any weight, measure, balance, or scale, which has been so altered, and every person who shall use or permit to be used for him or her, or have in his or her possession, as aforesaid, any weight, measure, balance, or scale which he or she has refused to allow to be examined or sealed by the sealer of weights and measures, or deputy sealer, according to the provisions of chapters 1 and 2 of this title, or who shall use or permit to be used for him or her or have in his or her possession any spring balance having a sliding or adjustable face plate or index, or any measure not made of the shape or dimensions required by law, shall be fined the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the town or city in which the offense shall have been committed, and one-half (1/2) thereof to the complainant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 16; P.L. 1902, ch. 974, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

47-3-2

; P.L. 1980, ch. 340, § 1.

47-3-3.
Giving false or insufficient weight or measure.

Whoever, himself or herself or by his or her servant or agent or as the servant or agent of another person, is guilty of giving false or insufficient weight or measure shall, for the first offense, be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00); for a second offense, by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200); and for a subsequent offense, by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) and by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) nor more than ninety (90) days, except for those offenses for which penalties are provided in §

47-3-3.1

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 17; P.L. 1912, ch. 832, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 407,§ 16; G.L. 1956, §

47-3-3

; P.L. 1983, ch. 266, § 1.

47-3-3.1.
Delivery of fuel oil — Fraud — Penalty.

Whoever sells or delivers fuel oil in quantities of twenty (20) gallons or over shall cause a delivery ticket, which shall consist of an original and at least one carbon copy thereof, to be issued. The ticket shall be serially numbered for the purpose of identification and shall have:

Delivery date;

Name and address of the seller; and

Name of purchaser legibly recorded on the ticket prior to delivery of the fuel oil.

Upon completion of delivery, the ticket should include:

Statement of quantity of fuel delivered by sealed meter device in gallons and fractions thereof, if any;

Price per gallon unless purchaser has requested that price not be shown;

Grade of fuel oil; and

Identity of person making the delivery.

One copy of the ticket shall be delivered to the purchaser or his or her agent at the time of delivery of the oil, unless the purchaser has requested or initiates a request that the vendor deliver the ticket to another person or location, or that the delivery of the ticket be made at another time. Another copy of the ticket shall be retained by the seller for a period of three (3) years to be in compliance with division of taxation regulations of the state.

The director of the department of labor and training shall be authorized to enter and go into or upon, at the time of delivery of fuel oil, without warrant, any vehicle to inspect or examine the metering system, vehicle tank compartments, and delivery tickets then in the actual possession or under the control of the person making the delivery and may seize, without warrant, any delivery tickets suspected of constituting a deceptive or fraudulent practice. No copy of the retained delivery ticket shall be destroyed, but may be voided and kept on file.

On deliveries of fuel oils made through a meter, the quantity determinations of the oil delivered shall be mechanically printed on the ticket at the time of delivery. A sales sequence number shall also be mechanically printed on the ticket by the ticket printing mechanism of the metering system unless the printing mechanism is of the cumulative type. The sales sequence number shall not be returnable to zero until it has reached its highest attainable number.

Only one delivery ticket may be inserted into the ticket printing mechanism, and in the case of vehicle tank meters, the ticket shall not be inserted until immediately before a delivery is begun, and in no case shall a ticket be left in the printing mechanism when the vehicle is in motion while on a public street, highway, or thoroughfare. The possession of a preprinted ticket imprinted with a gallon amount in advance of delivery shall be prima facie evidence of intent to use the ticket in violation of this section.

Deliveries of fuel oil made from vehicle tank compartments, not measured at the time of sale by a sealed metering system, shall be made only from calibrated compartments which are filled to an indicator that has been sealed by a sealer or inspector of weights and measures. The preceding sentence shall not apply to the transfer, exchange, or sale of fuel oil which is being transported between bulk storage facilities, or to a purchaser who initiates a request in writing that he or she wishes to accept a carbon copy of the bulk storage metered loading ticket.

Penalties.

Whoever violates any provision of this section shall be punished for the first offense, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); for the second offense, by a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000); and for each subsequent offense, by a fine of four thousand dollars ($4,000) and/or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months.

Whoever alters or substitutes a delivery ticket for fraudulent or deceptive purposes shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or both.

In addition to the foregoing penalties, anyone found guilty of violating the provisions of this section shall also be liable civilly to the person defrauded for an amount equal to three (3) times the dollar amount of the cost of the fuel oil of which the party was defrauded.

Definitions. Whenever in this section, unless otherwise defined, the words “fuel oil” or “petroleum products” are used, they shall be construed to be home heating fuels.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 266, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 118; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 65.

47-3-4.
Arrests and prosecutions by director and sealers.

The director of the department of labor and training, and the city and town sealers of weights and measures in the various cities and towns throughout the state, shall be, by virtue of their respective offices, special constables, and as special constables they shall have power to prosecute all persons violating the provisions of this chapter, and shall not be required in prosecutions to furnish any surety for costs. They shall also have power to arrest upon view without warrant, and to detain for a period of not more than twelve (12) hours any person found violating any of the provisions of chapters 1 — 4, or 6 — 8 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 669, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-3-4

.